test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-odd-vch-vch-veeskir_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - veeskir: # 2A v -kk, sk s'k, ee >iä, VV V
    veeskir+N+Sg+Nom: veeskir
    veeskir+N+Sg+Gen: viäskár
    veeskir+N+Sg+Acc: viäskár
    veeskir+N+Sg+Ill: viäskárân
    veeskir+N+Sg+Loc: viäskárist
    veeskir+N+Sg+Com: viäskáráin                #viäskárááin
    veeskir+N+Sg+Abe: viäskárttáá
    veeskir+N+Pl+Nom: viäskáreh
    veeskir+N+Pl+Gen: viäskárij
    veeskir+N+Pl+Acc: viäskárijd
    veeskir+N+Pl+Ill: viäskáráid                #viäskárááid
    veeskir+N+Pl+Loc: viäskárijn
    veeskir+N+Pl+Com: viäskárijguin             #viäskárijguim, viäskárijgijn
    veeskir+N+Pl+Abe: viäskárijttáá
    veeskir+N+Ess: veskirin                     #viäskárin
    veeskir+N+Par: veskirid                     #viäskárid
